Utah statutes.
35A-3-602.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Adjudicative proceeding" means an action or proceeding of the department
described in Section 63G-4-102.
(2)  "Administrative order" means an order issued by the department involving
an overpayment of public assistance.
(3)  "Court order" means a judgment or order of any court of this state,
another state, or the federal government that involves an overpayment of
public assistance.
(4)  "Department" means the Department of Workforce Services.
(5)  "Notice of agency action" means the notice required to commence an
adjudicative proceeding as described in Section 63G-4-201.
(6)  "Obligor" means an individual who is liable to the state under Section
35A-3-603 and applicable federal statutes and regulations, or an individual
against whom an administrative or judicial order determining overpayment has
been obtained.
(7) (a)  "Overpayment" means money, public assistance, or any other thing of
value provided under a state or federally funded benefit program to the extent
that the person receiving the thing of value is not entitled to receive it or
is not entitled to receive it at the level provided.
(b)  It includes money paid to a provider under this title in connection with
public assistance or any other publicly funded assistance program to the
extent that the provider receives payment:
(i)  for goods or services not provided; or
(ii)  in excess of the amount to which the provider is entitled.
